Louisiana, session 2026, HB753.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:4216.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4216.1. Louisiana Food Transparency, Protein Access, and Consumer Choice Act
A. The legislature of Louisiana finds that direct intrastate sales of
producer-raised livestock products support Louisiana agriculture and local food
systems. Expanding transparency in the food supply and increasing consumer access
to locally produced foods, including locally raised livestock protein, promotes food
security, strengthens local food systems, and increases equitable access to healthy,
nutrient-dense food options consistent with federal nutrition policy goals.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the meanings
stated below:
(1) "Informed end consumer" means an individual who purchases livestock
products for personal or household consumption, not for resale, and who has been
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1288 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 753
provided written disclosure that the product is not subject to state or federal meat
inspection laws.
(2) "Intrastate" means commerce within the state.
(3) "Livestock" means cattle, bison, domesticated bovine species including
water buffalo, sheep, goats, and domestic rabbits raised for human consumption
within the state of Louisiana.
(4) "Livestock products" means meat derived from livestock raised by a
producer and slaughtered and processed at a licensed custom slaughter facility
operating in accordance with R.S. 3:4215.
(5) "Producer" means a natural person who raises livestock within Louisiana.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, livestock products
derived from livestock raised by the producer shall not be subject to state meat
inspection requirements, provided that the following conditions are met:
(1) The livestock was raised by the producer.
(2) Slaughter and processing occur exclusively at a licensed custom
slaughter facility operating in compliance with R.S. 3:4215.
(3) The livestock products are sold only directly to an informed end
consumer.
(4) The livestock products are not resold.
(5) The transaction occurs entirely within the state of Louisiana.
(6) The livestock products are not introduced into interstate commerce.
D. All slaughter and processing conducted pursuant to this Section shall
comply with the sanitation requirements applicable to custom slaughter under R.S.
3:4215 and any rules adopted by the commissioner governing custom slaughter
facilities.
E.(1) All livestock products sold pursuant to this Section shall bear a label
stating the following: "THIS PRODUCT WAS PRODUCED AND PROCESSED
WITHOUT STATE OR FEDERAL INSPECTION. FOR INTRASTATE USE
ONLY. NOT FOR RESALE. FOR PERSONAL CONSUMPTION ONLY."
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1288 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 753
(2) The producer shall provide written disclosure to the informed end
consumer prior to completion of the transaction.
F. Livestock products sold under this Section shall not be:
(1) Sold to retail grocery establishments for resale.
(2) Sold to restaurants or food service establishments for resale.
(3) Distributed through wholesale channels.
(4) Represented as inspected meat.
(5) Transported or shipped outside the state of Louisiana.
G.(1) A producer selling livestock products pursuant to this Section shall
maintain records for a minimum of one year from the date of sale. Records shall be
made available to the commissioner upon reasonable request for purposes of
enforcing sanitation, adulteration, or misbranding laws.
(2) The records required by this Subsection shall include the species of
livestock, the date of slaughter, the name and location of the licensed custom
slaughter facility, the date of sale, and the name of the informed end consumer.
H. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to amend, modify, supersede,
repeal, or otherwise affect any other provision of law, except as expressly provided
herein.
I. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a producer from utilizing state or
federal inspection programs, authorize interstate sale of uninspected meat, limit
federal authority under the Federal Meat Inspection Act, and exempt any person
from the prohibitions against adulteration or misbranding.